District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.16

Shares — Consideration for issuance.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 187, ch. 269, § 16
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-101.16.
1981 Ed., § 29-316.
1973 Ed., § 29-908c.

Prior Codifications